Rhode Island, session 2026, SB3316.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
WHEREAS, The Town Council of the Town of Scituate on April 9, 2026 adopted a
resolution requesting that the general assembly enact the following provision relating to the annual
financial town meeting:
Provided that the appropriations recommended by the Town Council have been
made no later than the fourth Thursday in April immediately preceding the town meeting
to be held on the first Tuesday in June, no motion which increases or reduces an
appropriation recommended by the town council by $10,000.00 or more, shall be in order
at such meeting unless notice of intention to make such motion has been presented to the
town treasurer with the signatures of not less than ten (10) qualified electors of the town
no later than the May 15 immediately preceding said such meeting. Notice of such motion
shall be included in the publication required under § 44-35-6. Provided notice of such
motion has been made, then amendments made at such town meeting to such motion for
any lesser amount may be considered at the town meeting.
SECTION 1. Section 4 of Chapter 1321 of the Public Laws Of, 1915, entitled “An Act
Fixing The Time For The Election Of Officers In The Town Of Scituate” as previously amended
by Chapter 3777 of the Public Laws of 1956, and by Chapters 225 and 312 of the Public Laws of
2022, is hereby amended to read as follows:
“Sec. 4. The town meeting for the ordering and disposing of taxes and consideration

of all matters relating to the finances of said town, shall be held in the calendar year 2023
on the first Tuesday next after the first Monday in April at 7:00 P.M., and in the calendar
year 2024 and thereafter on the first Tuesday in the month of June at 7:00 P.M., at which
meeting the town moderator shall preside. The meeting shall be held in the town of Scituate
at such location as the town council shall determine by resolution from time to time, unless
the alternative provisions of § 45-3-4, are invoked by the town council. Provided that the
budget recommended by the town council has been made no later than the fourth Thursday
in April immediately preceding the town meeting to be held on the first Tuesday in June,
and such budget recommendation has been posted on the town's website within seven (7)
calendar days thereafter, no motion which increases or reduces an appropriation
recommended by the town council by $10,000 or more, shall be in order at such meeting
unless notice of intention to make such motion has been presented to the town treasurer
with the signatures of not less than ten (10) qualified electors of the town no later than the
May 15 immediately preceding said such meeting. Notice of any such motion shall be
included in the warrant required under § 45-3-8 or posted on the town's website at least
seven (7) days prior to such town meeting. Provided notice of such motion has been made,
then amendments made at such town meeting to such motion for any lesser amount may
be considered at the town meeting.”
SECTION 2. The question of the acceptance or rejection of this act shall be submitted to
the electors of the town at the general election to be held on November 3, 2026. The question shall
be submitted in substantially the following form: “Shall an act, passed at the 2026 session of the
General Assembly, entitled ‘AN ACT REGARDING MOTIONS AT THE TOWN OF SCITUATE
ANNUAL FINANCIAL TOWN MEETING’ be approved?" and the warning for the election shall
contain the question to be submitted. The Town Board of Canvassers may combine any two or
more voting districts for the election and when so combined shall be treated as a voting district. If
so combined, the Town Board of Canvassers shall advertise the combination of districts in a
newspaper of general circulation in the Town. From the time the election is warned and until it is
held, it shall be the duty of the Town Clerk to keep a copy of the act available at his or her office
for public inspection, but the validity of the election shall not be affected by this requirement.
The town clerk of the town of Scituate shall forthwith after said town meeting certify to
the secretary of state the result of this vote upon the question submitted.
SECTION 3. This section and section 2 of this act shall take effect upon passage, and the
remainder of this act shall take effect upon the approval of this act by a majority of those voting on
LC006497/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

the question at the election prescribed by section 2.
========
LC006497/SUB A
========
LC006497/SUB A - Page 3 of 4